mn_MN/mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX F0 0 ахаар/08 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахааргүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахааргүйсэнсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахгүйсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахгүйсэнсэн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахлаар/00 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахсан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахсансан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахтай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуй/70 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйяа [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйн [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйнх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйц/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахуйцынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ууштай/70 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 уузай [^и]х
SFX F0 0 хул [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахчаа [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахчаан [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ахынх/040870 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 чухуй [^и]х
SFX F0 0 ашгүй/73 [^и]х
SFX F0 0 шгүй/73 [аийуя]
SFX F0 0 ашгүй/73 [сзцтд]
